src/morphology/affixes/declinations.lexc
LEXICON SEEME    ! only kümme, seeme, kööme; like HAARE

+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                      ! seeme
+Sg+Par:%{W%}%+t GI ;                   ! seemet
:ne 2C_EXCL_SG_PAR ;                    ! seemne etc

! only if the plural partitive with -id is more frequent than the one with sid (puid-puusid),
! then the word may have vowel plural forms

LEXICON TALV  ! only talv

:v%+%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
+Sg+Nom%+Use%/Rare:i GI ;  ! tali

LEXICON PÕLV  ! only põlv

:v%+%{pl.i%} EIT ;
+Sg+Nom%+Use%/Rare:i GI ;  ! tali
%+Use%/Rare:v%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;  ! põlvil etc
+Pl+Trm%+Use%/Rare:v%+i%+ni GI ;  ! põlvini

LEXICON PUU ! 11 words (kuu, maa, etc) that have possible vowel plural forms 

: ARMEE ;
%+Use%/Rare:%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! puil etc


LEXICON SÜDA                   ! only süda; like habe

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                          ! süda
+Sg+Par:n%+t GI ;                       ! südant
:me 2C_EXCL_SG_PAR ;                   ! südame etc

LEXICON TEINE   ! only teine; almost = NAINE; much like OLULINE
                  
+Sg+Nom: GI ;
: NE_S ;
+Sg+Ill:E1 GI ;                          ! teise (should be 3rd grade... )
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:E1%+sse GI ;             ! teisesse
+Pl+Par:%+I1 GI ;                           ! teisi
%+Use%/Rare:%+I1 N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! teisil etc

LEXICON TUHAT      ! only tuhat; like LOHAKAS

+Sg+Nom:t GI ;                          ! tuhat
:nde 2C ;                               ! tuhande etc
! ????  +Sg+Par:%+t GI ;                              ! tuhat

LEXICON VAHER    ! VVS 3 unstable (closed) type; strengthening gradation
                 ! only vaher, aher
+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                     ! vaher
:a 2C ;                                ! vahtra etc

LEXICON VÄIKE  ! only väike(ne)  VVS 10

: XÄIKE ;
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:kese%+id GI ;            ! väikeseid
+Pl+Par:kse%+id GI ;                        ! väikseid

LEXICON XÄIKE  ! VVS 10 common part of väike(ne), päike(ne), äike(ne)

+Sg+Nom:ke GI ;
+Sg+Nom%+Use%/Rare:kene GI ;
:kene NE_S ;
%+Use%/Rare:kse N_SG_SUBPARA ;                ! xäikse etc 
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:kse%+t GI ;                ! xäikset
+Sg+Ill:kese%+sse GI ;                        ! xäikesesse
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:kse%+sse GI ;              ! xäiksesse
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:ke%+sse GI ;               ! xäikesse (haplology)
%+Use%/Rare:kse%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;       
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:kes%+i GI ;                ! xäikesi
%+Use%/Rare:kes%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! xäikesil etc
%+Use%/Rare:kese%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;      ! xäikeseil etc
%+Use%/Rare:kse%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! xäikseil etc

LEXICON ÕLU                  ! only õlu

+Sg+Nom:u GI ;                                ! õlu
:le N_SG_SUBPARA ;                             ! õlle etc 
+Sg+Par:u%+t GI ;                             ! õlut
+Sg+Ill:le%+sse GI ;                           ! õllesse 
:le%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                         ! õllede etc 
+Pl+Par:le%+sid GI ;                              ! õlusid
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:u%+sid GI ;                              ! õlusid


!---------------
! not-so-exceptional inflectional types
!---------------

! VVS 1
LEXICON AASTA    ! default? for vowel-final; stress on penultimate syllable words

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;             ! aasta
: 2C ;                              ! aasta etc

! VVS 2
LEXICON REDEL    ! VVS 2 default for consonant-ending, stress on penultimate syllable words
   
+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;             ! redel, koppel
:I5 2C ;                            ! redeli etc

! VVS 2
LEXICON VIRSIK    ! VVS 2 default for -ik, -ing; stress on penultimate syllable words

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;              ! virsik
:u 2C ;                              ! virsiku etc

! VVS 2
LEXICON LOHAKAS      ! VVS 2 -kas, -jas etc ending words (incl derivations)

+Sg+Nom:s GI ;                       ! lohakas
: 2C ;                               ! lohaka etc

! VVS 2
LEXICON TUNTUD      ! VVS 2 -d ending words (incl derivations)

+Sg+Nom:d GI ;                       ! tuntud
: 2C ;                               ! tuntu etc
 
! VVS 2
LEXICON MAGUS    ! VVS 2 unstable (closed) type

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                         ! magus
:A1 2C ;                               ! magusa

! VVS 2
LEXICON HALE    ! VVS 2 unstable (closed) type

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                         ! hale, sajas
:da 2C ;                              ! haleda, sajanda


! VVS 3
LEXICON HOOLAS    ! VVS 3 unstable (closed) type; strengthening gradation

+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                           ! hoolas
:a 2C ;                                      ! hoolsa etc
+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:%{W%}%+t GI ;             ! hoolast
%+Use%/NotNorm:%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;      ! hoolaste etc 

! VVS 4
LEXICON HABE    ! VVS 4 unstable (closed) type; almost like HAARE, but no gradation

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                          ! habe
+Sg+Par:%+t GI ;                       ! habet
:me 2C_EXCL_SG_PAR ;                   ! habeme etc

! VVS 5
LEXICON HAARE    ! VVS 5 unstable (closed) type

+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                      ! haare
+Sg+Par:%{W%}%+t GI ;                   ! haaret
:me 2C_EXCL_SG_PAR ;                    ! haarme etc

! VVS 6
LEXICON PINGE    ! VVS 6 stable (open) + unstable (closed) type; 
! open to verbal derivations, e.g. kiune from kiunuma

+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                      ! pinge
+Sg+Par:%{W%}%+t GI ;                   ! pinget
:%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;               ! pingete etc 
: 2C_STRONG ;                           ! pinge etc, pingeid, pingeil etc

! VVS 7
LEXICON KOTKAS    !  VVS 7 unstable (closed) type; 

+Sg+Nom:s%{W%} GI ;                      ! kotkas
+Sg+Par:s%{W%}%+t GI ;                   ! kotkast
:s%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;               ! kotkaste etc 
: 2C_STRONG ;                            ! kotka etc, kotkaid, kotkail etc

! VVS 8
LEXICON PIPAR    !  VVS 8 unstable (closed) type; = HOOLAS

+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                       ! pipar
+Sg+Par:%{W%}%+t GI ;                    ! pipart
:%{W%}%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                ! piparde etc 
%+Use%/NotNorm:a%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;      ! piprate etc 
:a 2C_STRONG ;

! VVS 8
LEXICON KANNEL    ! VVS 8 unstable (closed) type; = PIPAR, but stem vowel -e instead of -a

+Sg+Nom:%{W%} GI ;                        ! kannel, tütar
+Sg+Par:%{W%}%+t GI ;                     ! kannelt, tütart
:%{W%}%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                 ! kannelde, tütarde etc 
%+Use%/NotNorm:e%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! kandlete, tütrete etc 
:e 2C_STRONG ;

! VVS 9, 10
LEXICON SOOLANE  ! VVS 9 simplex words ending with -s (katus), 10 affix -ne; 
                       
+Sg+Nom: GI ;
: NE_S ;
+Sg+Ill:E1%+sse GI ;                         ! soolasesse, katusesse
+Pl+Par:E1%+id GI ;                          ! soolaseid, katuseid
%+Use%/Rare:E1%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! soolaseil, katuseil etc

! VVS 11, 12
LEXICON OLULINE   ! affixes -lane, -line, -mine, -tine, -ke(ne), -stikune (?)
                  ! derived words ending with -us, -is (?) (harjutus)
                  
+Sg+Nom: GI ;
: NE_S ;
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:E1%+sse GI ;             ! olulisesse, harjutusesse
+Sg+Ill:E1%+se GI ;                          ! olulisse, harjutusse (haplology)
+Pl+Par:%+I1 GI ;                           ! olulisi, harjutusi
%+Use%/Rare:%+I1 N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! olulisil, harjutusil etc

! VVS 9 & (11), 10 & (12)
LEXICON KATKINE  ! affix -ne, but sg ill, pl part and vocal cases also like -line
                 ! simplex -s, but also like -us (gloobus) 
                 
+Sg+Nom: GI ;
: SOOLANE ;
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:E1%+se GI ;               ! katkisse, gloobusse (haplology)
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:%+I1 GI ;                ! katkisi, gloobusi
%+Use%/Rare:%+I1 N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! katkisil etc; (ever used?)


! VVS (9) & 11, (10) & 12
LEXICON SUULINE  ! affix -line, but pl part and vocal cases also like -ne
                 ! derived -us, but pl part and vocal cases (?) also like simplex -s (vaatlus) 

+Sg+Nom: GI ;
: OLULINE ;
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:E1%+id GI ;               ! suuliseid, vaatluseid
%+Use%/Rare:E1%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! suuliseil, vaatluseil etc

! VVS 12
LEXICON PEENIKE   ! affix -ke; almost = OLULINE, except sg nom

+Sg+Nom: GI ;
+Sg+Nom%+Use%/Rare:ne GI ;
:ne NE_S ;
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:se%+sse GI ;              ! olulisesse, harjutusesse
+Sg+Ill:s%+se GI ;                           ! olulisse, harjutusse (haplology)
+Pl+Par:s%+i GI ;                            ! olulisi, harjutusi
%+Use%/Rare:s%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! vocal pl cases  olulisil, harjutusil

!  VVS 13
LEXICON KEEL    !  VVS 13 unstable (closed) type; 

: VARS ;
%+Use%/Hyp:%{W%}%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! vocal pl cases  keelil; except for some expressions (suuril silmil)

!  VVS 14 unstable (closed) type;
LEXICON VARS     !  VVS 14 unstable (closed) type;

! %{W%} here helps to select the right paradigm slots for stem change;
! it does not really stand for "weak grade"

+Sg+Nom: GI ;                                 ! vars
:e%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;                        ! varre etc 
+Sg+Par:%+t GI ;                              ! vart
+Sg+Ill:%{S%}%+de SG_ILL ;              ! varde
+Sg+Ill:e%{W%} SG_ILL ;          ! varresse 
:%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                          ! varte etc 
+Pl+Par:%+i GI ;                              ! varsi
! +N%+Use%/Hyp:%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! varsil?; except for some expressions (uusil)

!  VVS 15 unstable (closed) type;
LEXICON MESI     

+Sg+Nom:i GI ;                                ! mesi
:e%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;                        ! mee etc 
+Sg+Par:%+tt GI ;                             ! mett
+Sg+Ill:e%{W%}%+sse GI ;                      ! meesse
:%{W%}%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;                     ! mete etc 
+Pl+Par:i GI ;                                ! mesi ?? meesid ???
! +N%+Use%/Hyp: N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;          ! mesil? etc; except for some expressions (käsil) ?

! VVS 16
LEXICON PERE

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
: N_SG_SUBPARA ;      
+Sg+Par:%+t GI ;                           ! peret
+Sg+Ill:%{S%} SG_ILL ;               ! perre
+Sg+Ill:%{W%} SG_ILL ;        ! peresse 
:%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                       ! perede etc
+Pl+Par:%+sid #;                           ! peresid

! %{W%} here helps to select the right paradigm slots for stem change;
! it does not really stand for "weak grade"
! VVS 17, 18
LEXICON KAVA

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ;                      ! kava etc
+Sg+Par: GI ;                              ! kava
+Sg+Ill:%{S%} SG_ILL ;               ! kavva
+Sg+Ill:%{W%} SG_ILL ;        ! kavasse 
:%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                       ! kavade etc
+Pl+Par:%+%{s%}%{i%}%{d%} PL_PAR ;       ! kavasid & kavu ...

! VVS 2 & 19 
LEXICON MUUSEUM  ! undecided which stable type (aktiivne muuttüüp): TAUD or REDEL 

+Sg+Nom:%{no.apo%} GI ;
:i%{W%} N_SG_SUBPARA ; 
+Sg+Par:i GI ;                              ! muuseumi
+Sg+Ill:i GI ;                              ! muuseumi  ! ?? not sure; rare ??
+Sg+Ill%+Use%/Rare:i%{W%}%+sse GI ;         ! muuseumisse ?? not sure; rare ??
:i%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                       ! muuseumide etc 
+Pl+Par:e GI ;                              ! muuseume

+Sg+Par%+Use%/Rare:i%+t GI ;                ! muuseumit
%+Use%/Rare:i%+te N_PL_SUBPARA ;            ! muuseumite etc 
+Pl+Par%+Use%/Rare:e%+id GI ;               ! muuseumeid
%+Use%/Rare:e%+i N_VOWEL_PL_SUBPARA ;       ! muuseumeil etc

! VVS 20
LEXICON MERI   ! unstable type (passiivne muuttüüp) lumi, tuli, uni, veri

+Sg+Nom:i GI ;
:e N_SG_SUBPARA ;                        ! mere etc
+Sg+Par:%+d GI ;                         ! merd
+Sg+Ill:e%{S%} SG_ILL ;            ! merre
+Sg+Ill:e%{W%} SG_ILL ;     ! meresse 
:%+e%+de N_PL_SUBPARA ;                  ! merede etc
+Pl+Par:e%+sid GI ;                      ! meresid
